Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally. The full-time clerk of any city or town shall administer the provisions of sections 203B.04 to 203B.15 and 203B.30 if: (1) the county auditor of that county has designated the clerk to administer them; or (2) the clerk has given the county auditor of that county notice of intention to administer them. The designation or notice must specify whether the clerk will be responsible for the administration of a ballot board as provided in section 203B.121new text begin and whether the municipality's office will be designated an absentee voting location pursuant to section 203B.081, subdivision 1, or only for early voting pursuant to section 203B.081, subdivision 1anew text end . A clerk of a city that is located in more than one county may only administer the provisions of sections 203B.04 to 203B.15 and 203B.30 if the clerk has been designated by each of the county auditors or has provided notice to each of the county auditors that the city will administer absentee voting. A clerk may only administer the provisions of sections 203B.04 to 203B.15 and 203B.30 if the clerk has technical capacity to access the statewide voter registration system in the secure manner prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state must identify hardware, software, security, or other technical prerequisites necessary to ensure the security, access controls, and performance of the statewide voter registration system. A clerk must receive training approved by the secretary of state on the use of the statewide voter registration system before administering this section. A clerk may not use the statewide voter registration system until the clerk has received the required training. The county auditor must notify the secretary of state of any municipal clerk who will be administering the provisions of this section and the duties that the clerk will administer. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon the revisor of statutes' receipt of the early voting certification and applies to elections held on or after the 85th day after the revisor of statutes receives the certification, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.121, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Opening of envelopes. new text begin (a) new text end After the close of business on the 19th day before the election, the ballots from deleted text begin secrecydeleted text end new text begin ballotnew text end envelopes within the signature envelopes marked "Accepted" may be opened, duplicated as needed in the manner provided in section 206.86, subdivision 5, initialed by the members of the ballot board, and deposited in the appropriate ballot box. If more than one voted ballot is enclosed in the ballot envelope, the ballots must be returned in the manner provided by section 204C.25 for return of spoiled ballots, and may not be counted. new text begin (b) Accepted signature envelopes must be segregated by precinct and processed in accordance with this subdivision on a precinct-by-precinct basis. Precincts within a combination polling place established in section 205A.11, subdivision 2, may be processed together. At each step, members of the ballot board must notify the official responsible for the ballot board if there is a discrepancy in the count. Any discrepancy must be noted in the ballot board incident log. new text end new text begin (c) Before opening accepted signature envelopes, two members of the ballot board must count and record the number of envelopes and ensure that the count matches either the number of accepted signature envelopes provided by the official responsible for the ballot board or the number of signature envelopes accepted by the ballot board that day. new text end new text begin (d) After ballot envelopes have been removed from the signature envelopes, two members of the ballot board must count and record the number of ballot envelopes to ensure the count matches the number of accepted signature envelopes. Any discrepancy must be noted in the ballot board incident log. The governing body responsible for the ballot board must retain all ballot envelopes through the contest period of that election. new text end new text begin (e) After ballots have been removed from the ballot envelopes, two members of the ballot board must count and record the number of ballots to ensure the count matches the number of accepted signature envelopes, accounting for any empty envelopes or spoiled ballots, which must be noted on the ballot board incident log. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.121, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Storage and counting of absentee ballots. (a) On a day on which absentee ballots are inserted into a ballot box, two members of the ballot board must: (1) remove the ballots from the ballot box at the end of the day; (2) without inspecting the ballots, ensure that the number of ballots removed from the ballot box is equal to the number of deleted text begin voters whosedeleted text end absentee ballots deleted text begin were accepteddeleted text end new text begin from the tally in subdivision 4 that were to be inserted into the ballot boxnew text end that day; and (3) seal and secure all voted and unvoted ballots present in that location at the end of the day. (b) After the polls have closed on election day, two members of the ballot board must count the ballots, tabulating the vote in a manner that indicates each vote of the voter and the total votes cast for each candidate or question. In state primary and state general elections, the results must indicate the total votes cast for each candidate or question in each precinct and report the vote totals tabulated for each precinct. The count must be recorded on a summary statement in substantially the same format as provided in section 204C.26. The ballot board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end submit at least one completed summary statement to the county auditor or municipal clerk. The county auditor or municipal clerk may require the ballot board to submit a sufficient number of completed summary statements to comply with the provisions of section 204C.27, or the county auditor or municipal clerk may certify reports containing the details of the ballot board summary statement to the recipients of the summary statements designated in section 204C.27. deleted text begin In state primary and state general elections,deleted text end These vote totals deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be added to the vote totals on the summary statements of the returns for the appropriate precinct. deleted text begin In other elections, these vote totals may be added to the vote totals on the summary statement of returns for the appropriate precinct or may be reported as a separate total.deleted text end The count deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be public. No vote totals from ballots may be made public before the close of voting on election day. (c) In addition to the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b), if the task has not been completed previously, the members of the ballot board must verify as soon as possible, but no later than 24 hours after the end of the hours for voting, that voters whose absentee ballots arrived after the rosters were marked or supplemental reports were generated and whose ballots were accepted did not vote in person on election day. An absentee ballot submitted by a voter who has voted in person on election day must be rejected. All other accepted absentee ballots must be openednew text begin in accordance with the procedures outlined in subdivision 4, except for the absentee ballots cast using the alternative procedure in section 203B.081, subdivision 3new text end , duplicated if necessary, and counted by members of the ballot board. The vote totals from these ballots must be incorporated into the totals with the other absentee ballots and handled according to paragraph (b). Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.30, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Processing of ballots. new text begin At the end of each day when early voting occurs, new text end the early voting officials mustnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end remove and secure ballots cast deleted text begin during the early voting period following the procedures in section 203B.121, subdivision 5, paragraph (a).deleted text end new text begin that day, noting the date, voting location, and number of ballots cast;new text end new text begin (2) without inspecting the ballots, ensure that the number of ballots removed from the ballot box is equal to the number of voter certificates that were signed by voters in subdivision 2, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (3) seal and secure all voted and unvoted ballots present in that location at the end of the day. new text end The deleted text begin absenteedeleted text end ballot board must count the ballots after the polls have closed on election day following the procedures in section 203B.121, subdivision 5, paragraph (b). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon the revisor of statutes' receipt of the early voting certification and applies to elections held on or after the 85th day after the revisor of statutes receives the certification, whichever is later. new text end